Idaho, session 2026, H0545.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-3405, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3405. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. (1) Licensure as a "licensed
professional counselor" shall be restricted to persons who:
(a) Have not been convicted, found guilty, or received a withheld judg-
ment or a suspended sentence in this state or in any other state of a
crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1),
Idaho Code;
(b) Have submitted to a fingerprint-based criminal history background
check in accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code; and
(c) Have successfully completed each of the following requirements:
(i) A master's degree or higher in counseling or a related field
of study, as approved by the board, that includes completion of a
practicum of supervised clinical contact as defined by rule;
(ii) An examination, if required by the board's rules; and
(iii) One thousand (1,000) hours of supervised experience in coun-
seling acceptable to the board.
(2) In accordance with the provisions of section 67-9406, Idaho Code,
the provisions of subsection (1)(c) of this section shall also be deemed sat-
isfied with respect to a person who:
(a) Is a resident of the state of Idaho;
(b) Has served as a chaplain in any branch of the United States military
as evidenced by a DD form 214 certificate of release or discharge;
(c) Possesses a DD form 214 certificate of release or discharge for each
period of active duty indicating time served in the United States mili-
tary with honorable discharge for all periods of active duty;
(d) Has completed four (4) units of clinical pastoral education; and
(e) Has completed and possesses documentation of one thousand (1,000)
hours of direct client contact under the direction of a supervisory
chaplain or a supervisory counselor in any branch of the United States
military.


(2) (3) A license will not be issued to an individual whose license,
certification, or registration has been revoked or suspended in this or any
other state and in this or any other related field. Such an individual may
not be licensed under this chapter unless the period of revocation or sus-
pension has been completed and the board has conducted a competency review
and determined that an acceptable degree of rehabilitation has been accom-
plished.
(4) In accordance with the provisions of section 67-9406(4), Idaho
Code, a person who qualifies for licensure pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section shall not be required by the board to take an examination or pay an
application fee.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-3405A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3405A. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE. (1) Licensure as a "licensed
clinical professional counselor" shall be restricted to persons who:
(1) (a) Hold a valid licensed professional counselor license in good
standing;
(2) (b) Document two thousand (2,000) hours of direct client contact
experience under supervision in no less than a two (2) year period as set
forth in this chapter and the rules of the board;
(3) (c) Successfully complete a written examination as approved by the
board and defined in rules of the board; and
(4) (d) Submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history background
check in accordance with section 67-9411A, Idaho Code.
(2)(a) In accordance with the provisions of section 67-9406, Idaho
Code, the provisions of subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section
shall be deemed satisfied with respect to a person who:
(i) Is a resident of the state of Idaho;
(ii) Has served as a chaplain in any branch of the United States
military as evidenced by a DD form 214 certificate of release or
discharge;
(iii) Possesses a DD form 214 certificate of release or discharge
for each period of active duty indicating time served in the United
States military with honorable discharge for all periods of active
duty;
(iv) Has completed four (4) units of clinical pastoral education;
and
(v) Has completed and possesses documentation of two thousand
(2,000) hours of direct client contact under the direction of a
supervisory chaplain or a supervisory counselor in any branch of
the United States military.
(b) In accordance with the provisions of section 67-9406(4), Idaho
Code, a person who qualifies for licensure pursuant to this subsection
shall not be required by the board to take an examination or pay an ap-
plication fee.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.